New York, session 2025-2026, S5688.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 4 of section 202 of the vehicle and traffic 2 law, as amended by chapter 61 of the laws of 1989, the subdivision head- 3 ing and paragraphs (a) and (e) as amended by chapter 496 of the laws of 4 1995, and paragraph (b) as amended by chapter 293 of the laws of 1989, 5 is amended and a new subdivision 6 is added to read as follows: 6 4. Registration lists and title information. (a) The commissioner 7 shall have discretion to contract with [the highest responsible] any 8 successful bidder or bidders to furnish the registration information 9 specified in this section from the records of all vehicle registrations 10 from any registration period, or number of periods not exceeding five 11 years in the aggregate, with respect to a given territory or information 12 on titles. In such event, the fees provided by this section shall not 13 apply to copies of records furnished under any such contract. Any such 14 contract entered into by the commissioner pursuant to this section shall 15 not be for a term of more than two years and shall contain language 16 prohibiting [the] any successful bidder or bidders from assigning the 17 contract and from any use or resale of the information received which 18 use or resale is contrary to the public policy of this state or is 19 contrary to the public morals or welfare. In addition, any such sale of 20 registration information shall be limited to only that part of the vehi- 21 cle registration records describing the name and address of the owner of EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09568-02-5 S. 5688--A 2 1 the vehicle and the make, model, year, weight, body style, number of 2 passengers and cylinders, fuel, license number, type of registration and 3 transaction, validation and expiration date and vehicle identification 4 number of the vehicle. 5 (a-1) The commissioner shall affix a cost for the sale of such lists 6 or other records specified in paragraph (a) of this subdivision in bulk 7 not to exceed the annual cost of one million five hundred twenty thou- 8 sand dollars ($1,520,000). 9 (b) The commissioner shall notify each vehicle registrant that the 10 registration information specified in paragraph (a) of this subdivision 11 has been or will be furnished to the contracting party. The commissioner 12 shall inform each vehicle registrant when such registrant first makes 13 application for a vehicle registration or when such registrant applies 14 to renew an existing vehicle registration how to achieve the deletion of 15 such information from the contracting party's file. The contract between 16 the commissioner and the contracting party shall provide that, upon the 17 request of the registrant made in such manner and in such form as shall 18 be prescribed by the commissioner, such registration information shall 19 be deleted from the contracting party's file for all purposes, except: 20 (i) issuance of manufacturer's warranty, safety recall or similar 21 notices, or (ii) statistical complications, or (iii) for use by any 22 insurer or by a self-insured entity or its agents, employees, or 23 contractor, in connection with motor vehicle claims investigation activ- 24 ities, antifraud activities, rating or underwriting. 25 (b-1) Vehicle accident report information and emissions information. 26 The commissioner shall have discretion to contract with responsible 27 vendors to furnish the vehicle accident report and emissions information 28 specified in this subdivision from the records of all vehicle accident 29 reports and emissions information in bulk for all accidents and emission 30 inspection records occurring during the course of the contract for use 31 in vehicle history reports. The vendors shall pay a fee for such infor- 32 mation with the combined cost not to exceed thirty percent of the bulk 33 title and registration fee. In such event, the fees provided by this 34 section shall not apply to copies of records furnished under any such 35 contract for the vehicle accident information. Any such contract entered 36 into by the commissioner pursuant to this section shall not be for a 37 term of more than two years and shall contain language prohibiting 38 successful vendors from assigning the contract and from any use or 39 resale of the information received which use or resale is contrary to 40 the public policy of this state or is contrary to the public morals or 41 welfare. Such bulk data set may include all requested relevant fields of 42 data but shall not contain personal information. 43 (c) Any material violation of the terms of such contract by [the] any 44 successful bidder or bidders not corrected or discontinued within thirty 45 days following receipt of notice of such violation will automatically 46 cancel and void its contract with the commissioner and disqualify it 47 from bidding for the five successive years following such cancellation. 48 (d) Any contract authorized by this section shall be subject to the 49 provisions of article nine of the state finance law. 50 (e) The commissioner may from time to time require that the contract- 51 ing party pursuant to this section submit written reports, in form 52 satisfactory to the commissioner, concerning the use of such registra- 53 tion or title information. 54 6. Additional requirements. The commissioner may require: 55 (a) Each successful bidder or bidders to post a performance bond in an 56 amount of not more than one million dollars; S. 5688--A 3 1 (b) A prohibition on the sale or redisclosure of the personal informa- 2 tion for the purpose of marketing extended vehicle warranties; 3 (c) A requirement that the bidder or bidders provide proof of general 4 liability and cyber-threat insurance coverage in an amount specified by 5 the contracting agency that is: 6 (i) In the amount of three million dollars; and 7 (ii) Reasonably related to the risks associated with unauthorized 8 access and use of the records; 9 (d) A requirement that the bidder or bidders include in each contract 10 with a third party that receives the personal information from the 11 bidder or bidders that the third party must comply with federal and 12 state laws regarding the records; 13 (e) A requirement that the bidder or bidders and any third party 14 receiving the personal information from the requestor protect the 15 personal information with appropriate and accepted industry standard 16 security measures for the type of information and the known risks from 17 unauthorized access and use of the information; and 18 (f) A requirement that the bidder or bidders annually provide to the 19 agency a report of all third parties to which the personal information 20 was disclosed under this section and the purpose of such disclosure. 21 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.